West Virginia, session 2025, HB2198.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 12. PROBATION AND PAROLE. §62-12-30. Extended supervision for certain drug offenders; sentencing; conditions; supervision provisions; supervision fee. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code to the contrary, any defendant convicted after the effective date of this section of a violation of §60A-4-401 or §60A-4-409 for the delivery of controlled substances in schedule I, II, and III in chapter 60A of this code, excluding marijuana, or for the possession with intent to deliver controlled substances in schedule I, II, and III in chapter 60A of this code, excluding marijuana, a conviction under §60A-4-411, a conviction under §60A-4-414, excluding marijuana, or a conviction under §60A-4-416, shall, as part of the sentence imposed at final disposition, be required to serve, in addition to any other penalty or condition imposed by the court, a period of supervised release of up to 10 years: Provided, That pursuant to the provisions of subsection (g) of this section, a court may modify, terminate, or revoke any term of supervised release imposed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.(b) The period of supervised release imposed by the provisions of this section shall begin upon the expiration of any period of probation, the expiration of any sentence of incarceration or the expiration of any period of parole supervision imposed or required of the person so convicted, whichever expires later.(c) Any person sentenced to a period of supervised release pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be supervised by a multijudicial circuit probation officer, if available. Until such time as a multijudicial circuit probation officer is available, the offender shall be supervised by the probation office of the sentencing court or of the circuit in which he or she resides.(d) A defendant sentenced to a period of supervised release shall be subject to any or all of the conditions applicable to a person placed upon probation pursuant to §62-12-9.(e) The sentencing court may, based upon defendant's ability to pay, impose a supervision fee to offset the cost of supervision. The fee may not exceed $50 per month. The fee may be modified periodically based upon the defendant's ability to pay.(f) Modification of conditions or revocation. -- The court may:(1) Terminate a term of supervised release and discharge the defendant released at any time after the expiration of two years of supervised release, pursuant to the provisions of the West Virginia Rules of Criminal Procedure relating to the modification of probation, if it is satisfied that this action is warranted by the conduct of the defendant released and the interests of justice;(2) Extend a period of supervised release if less than the maximum authorized period was previously imposed or modify, reduce, or enlarge the conditions of supervised release, at any time prior to the expiration or termination of the term of supervised release, consistent with the provisions of the West Virginia Rules of Criminal Procedure relating to the modification of probation and the provisions applicable to the initial setting of the terms and conditions of post-release supervision;(3) Revoke a term of supervised release and require the defendant to serve in prison all or part of the term of supervised release without credit for time previously served on supervised release if the court, pursuant to the West Virginia Rules of Criminal Procedure applicable to revocation of probation, finds by clear and convincing evidence that the defendant violated a condition of supervised release, except that a defendant whose term is revoked under this subdivision may not be required to serve more than the period of supervised release;(4) Order the defendant to remain at his or her place of residence during nonworking hours and, if the court so directs, to have compliance monitored by telephone or electronic signaling devices, except that an order under this paragraph may be imposed only as an alternative to incarceration.(g) Written statement of conditions. -- The court shall direct that the probation officer provide the defendant with a written statement at the defendant's sentencing hearing that sets forth all the conditions to which the term of supervised release is subject and that it is sufficiently clear and specific to serve as a guide for the defendant's conduct and for such supervision as is required.(h) Supervised release following revocation. -- When a term of supervised release is revoked and the defendant is required to serve a term of imprisonment that is less than the maximum term of supervised release authorized under subsection (a) of this section, the court may include a requirement that the defendant be placed on a term of supervised release after imprisonment. The length of the term of supervised release may not exceed the term of supervised release authorized by this section less any term of imprisonment that was imposed upon revocation of supervised release.(i) Delayed revocation. -- The power of the court, to revoke a term of supervised release for violation of a condition of supervised release and to order the defendant to serve a term of imprisonment and, subject to the limitations in subsection (i) of this section, a further term of supervised release extends beyond the expiration of the term of supervised release for any period necessary for the adjudication of matters arising before its expiration if, before its expiration, a warrant or summons has been issued on the basis of an allegation of such a violation.